Hawaii statutes.
§92-1.5 Administration of this part.
The director of the office of information practices shall administer this
part. The director shall establish procedures for filing and responding to
complaints filed by any person concerning the failure of any board to comply
with this part. An agency may not appeal a decision by the office of
information practices made under this chapter, except as provided in section
92F-43. The director of the office of information practices shall submit an
annual report of these complaints along with final resolution of complaints,
and other statistical data to the legislature, no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of each regular session. [L 1998, c 137, §2; am L 2012, c 176,
§2]

Law Journals and Reviews

2013 Law and Administrative Rules Governing Appeal Procedures
of Hawaii's Office of Information Practices. 36 UH L. Rev. 271 (2014).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next